Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2473.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Repeal of obsolete laws.(a) Intent.--The General Assembly declares that the repeals under subsection (b) are necessary to remove obsolete and expired laws related to insurance.(b) Repeals.--The following acts or provisions of law are repealed:(1) The act of July 11, 1996 (2nd Sp.Sess., P.L.1879, No.10), known as the Flood Insurance Education and Information Act.(2) Sections 635.1(d), 635.6(c) and 2194 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect immediately.1234567891011121314151617